Oklahoma, session 2026, SB804.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-890.3, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1-890.3. A. The State Board Commissioner of Health
shall promulgate rules necessary to implement the provisions of the
Continuum of Care and Assisted Living Act. Such rules shall
include, but shall not be limited to:
1. A uniform comprehensive resident screening instrument to
measure the needs and capabilities of residents in all settings and
to determine appropriate placements of residents;
2. Physical plant requirements meeting construction and life
safety codes, with provisions accommodating resident privacy and
independence in assisted living centers and in assisted living

components of continuum of care facilities based on the variable
capabilities of residents;
3. Staffing levels responsive to the variable needs of
residents, with provisions for sharing of staff between components
in a continuum of care facility;
4. Minimum standards for resident care including, but not
limited to, standards pertaining to medical care and administration
of medications. Standards pertaining to medication administration
shall, at a minimum, require the assisted living center or continuum
of care facility to:
a. provide or arrange qualified staff to administer
medications based on the needs of residents,
b. follow medication administration orders from a
qualified health care provider,
c. ensure that medications are reviewed monthly by a
Registered Nurse or pharmacist and quarterly by a
consultant pharmacist,
d. maintain medication administration records and
document all medication administration in such
records, and
e. have medication storage and disposal policies;
5. Standards for measuring quality outcomes for residents;
5. 6. Provisions for individualized services chosen by and
designed for each resident;
6. 7. Provisions to prohibit facility staff from disclosing a
resident’s financial information to third parties without written
consent of the resident or the designated representative of the
resident;
7. 8. Procedures for inspections and investigations of licensed
entities to ensure compliance with the Continuum of Care and
Assisted Living Act and rules promulgated by the Board Commissioner;
ENR. S. B. NO. 804 Page 2

8. 9. Enumeration of resident rights and responsibilities to be
observed by each facility and its staff. Such resident rights shall
include the freedom of choice regarding any personal attending
physicians and all other providers of medical services and supplies,
providing that the minimum standards are met by the provider
pursuant to the Continuum of Care and Assisted Living Act, without a
financial penalty or fee charged by the assisted living center;
9. 10. Provisions for a surety bond or deposit from each
applicant in an amount sufficient to guarantee that obligations to
residents will be performed, with provisions for reduction or waiver
of the surety bond or deposit when the assets of the applicant or
its contracts with other persons are sufficient to reasonably ensure
the performance of its obligations;
10. 11. Provisions for the development of a consumer guide or
similar resource to be posted on the Internet website of the State
Department of Health to assist individuals and families in
understanding the services provided by assisted living centers and
to compare and select a facility; and
11. 12. Provisions for posting results of routine inspections
and any complaint investigations of each assisted living center on
the Internet website of the Department. Such information shall be
regularly updated to include the facility’s plan of correction and
to indicate when a violation of a licensing regulation was corrected
by the facility; and
13. Provisions requiring execution of a plan of care and a
resident service contract with the resident or resident’s
representative.
B. The nursing care service of a continuum of care facility
shall be subject to the requirements, procedures and remedies set
out in the Nursing Home Care Act, including provisions relating to
resident rights.
C. The adult day care component of a continuum of care facility
shall be subject to requirements and procedures specified under the
Adult Day Care Act.
ENR. S. B. NO. 804 Page 3

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-890.9 of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Each assisted living center shall establish and maintain an
internal quality assurance committee that meets at least quarterly.
The committee shall:
1. Monitor trends and incidents;
2. Monitor customer satisfaction measures;
3. Document quality assurance efforts and outcomes;
4. Recommend internal policies on resident care including, but
not limited to, policies on administration of medications; and
5. Perform such other duties or functions as directed by the
State Commissioner of Health through rule.
B. The quality assurance committee shall include at least the
following:
1. A Registered Nurse or physician if a medical problem is to
be monitored or investigated;
2. The assisted living center administrator;
3. A direct care staff person or a staff person who has
responsibility for administration of medications;
4. A pharmacist consultant if a medication problem is to be
monitored or investigated; and
5. A person who has an ownership stake in the assisted living
center, or his or her designee.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 804 Page 4

Passed the Senate the 21st day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 7th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 804 Page 5